Illinois, session 104th, HB674.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Partnership for Deflection and 5Substance Use Disorder Treatment Act is amended by changing 6Section 1 as follows: 7    (50 ILCS 71/1)  (was 5 ILCS 820/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Community Partnership for Deflection and Substance Use 10Disorder Treatment Act.11(Source: P.A. 103-361, eff. 1-1-24.)